Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB992.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(a) and (c) of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 306. Boating Advisory Board.(a) Composition.--There is hereby continued within the commission a Boating Advisory Board. The board shall consist of the Secretary of [Environmental Resources, or his designee, the executive director of the commission and the assistant executive director of the commission in charge of watercraft safety,] Conservation and Natural Resources, or a designee of the Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources, and the two at-large members of the commission as described in section 301(b) (relating to organization of commission), all of whom shall be ex officio members, and five volunteer members to be appointed 123456789101112131415161718 by the Governor for terms of five years or, in the case of a vacancy, for the remainder of the unexpired term.* * *(c) Officers.--The board shall annually select one of the volunteer members as the chairman. [The assistant executive director for watercraft safety shall serve as secretary.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0992PN1083 - 2 - 12345678